District of Columbia statutes.
47-114

Deputy Disbursing Officer and assistant disbursing officers — Authority and duties.

The Deputy Disbursing Officer and the several assistant disbursing officers each shall have authority:

(1)

To make disbursements as an agent of the Disbursing Officer, District of Columbia;

(2)

To sign checks drawn against disbursing accounts of the Disbursing Officer, District of Columbia, with the Treasurer of the United States; and

(3)

To discharge all other duties required according to law or regulation to be performed by the Disbursing Officer, District of Columbia.

History

July 30, 1951, 65 Stat. 127, ch. 250, § 2
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-114.
1973 Ed., § 47-113b.

Editor's Notes

Disbursing Office abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-111.